Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1334
Property Tax Administrator; inspections, investigations, and studies; administration of tax laws.

The Property Tax Administrator may make such inspections, investigations, and studies as may be necessary for the adequate administration of his or her responsibilities pursuant to the provisions of sections 77-701 to 77-706 and 77-1327 to 77-1342. Such inspections, investigations, and studies may be made in cooperation with other state agencies, and, in connection therewith, the Property Tax Administrator may utilize reports and data of other state agencies.

Laws 1969, c. 622, § 10, p. 2515;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 130;

Laws 1999, LB 36, § 31;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 69.